dev/apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}ч COMMON-CLITICS ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}% торган V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{U%}ч%{I%} V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}ч%{A%}к V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>%{U%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>л%{I%}к GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>%{U%}%>ч%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ;
%<ger_fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}ч%{A%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH-CHI ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH-CHI ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH-CHI ;

! Optative/jussive forms

! FIXME
! echo '^кил<v><iv><opt><p1><sg>$' | hfst-proc -g kaz-tat.autogen.hfst >> килейм
! Should be: "килим"
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}йм COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}йк COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}нн%{A%}р COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-COMMON-PASSIVE

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-IR ;

LEXICON V-DER

!%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-COMMON ;
!%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-FUT-IR ;

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-COMMON ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-FUT-IR ;

LEXICON V-IV-IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-IR;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS-IR

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS-IR

! e.g. күрен
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-FUT-IR;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-DER;

LEXICON V-TV-IR

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER;
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON V-IV-AR

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER;

LEXICON V-TV-AR

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER;
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON VAUX-IR

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ;
%<vaux%>: V-FUT-IR ;

LEXICON VAUX-AR

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ;
%<vaux%>: V-FUT-AR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON COP-I

и%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:икән GER-POSS-REAL ;
и%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:икән%>л%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

и%<cop%>%<neg%>:түгел V-PERS-S1 ;
и%<cop%>%<past%>:икән V-PERS-S1 ;
и%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>:түгел% икән V-PERS-S1 ;
и%<cop%>%<ifi%>:иде V-PERS-S2 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-12SG-CASES

%<dat%>:иңа COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:ине COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:иннән COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:индә COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<px%>:инеке%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:индәге ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:индәй COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON PersonalPronouns

мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мин COMMON-CLITICS ;
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:минем COMMON-CLITICS ;
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:минемчә COMMON-CLITICS ;
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-12SG-CASES ;

син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:син COMMON-CLITICS ;
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:синең COMMON-CLITICS ;
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:синеңчә COMMON-CLITICS ;
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с PRON-12SG-CASES  ;

ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ул COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:аның COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңа COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңар COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңарга COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:аны COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аннан COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аңардан COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:анда COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:аңарда COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:аныкы%{n%} CASES ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:андагы ATTR-SUBST ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:аңардагы ATTR-SUBST ; ! Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<sim%>:андай COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:аныңча COMMON-CLITICS ;

без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:без PRON-PERS-INFL ;
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:безнеңчә COMMON-CLITICS ;

сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:сез PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:сезнеңчә COMMON-CLITICS ;

алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:алар PRON-PERS-INFL ;
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:аларча COMMON-CLITICS ;

Сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sp%>%<frm%>:Сез PRON-PERS-INFL ;
Сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sp%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:Сезнеңчә COMMON-CLITICS ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

! FIXME CHECK (CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA vs CLIT) I can't imagine forms like "бумын, бусың" etc,
! but not sure how it works in Kazakh /I.S./
!-----
! FIXME NOTE: <prn><dem><qnt> are archaic/dialectal in Tatar, so they should be
! restricted to RL. Kazakh <prn><dem><qnt>'s should be translated with
! <prn><dem> + хәтле/кадәр<post>. Anyway, it should be handled differently
! as it is handled now. /I.S./
!-----
! Good idea is to link prn.dem.sim forms alternatively to CLIT and CASE,
! so that it's "adverbial reading" (e.g. "шундый каты кычкырды") doesn't
! receive <nom> tag /IS/

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<gen%>:н%{I%}ң COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:ң%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:н%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:нн%{A%}н CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
%<loc%>:нд%{A%} CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
%<px%>:н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:нд%{A%}г%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:нд%{I%}й CASES ;
%<adv%>:л%{A%}й CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;     ! FIXME check cont. class
%<px3sp%>:%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

! FIXME: 1) link the below to PRON-DEM-INFL if possible (like "шушы" was linked there)
!            (later, once we are certain about things)
   
LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:моның COMMON-CLITICS ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:моңа COMMON-CLITICS ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:моны COMMON-CLITICS ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:моннан CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:монда CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:моныкы%{n%} CASES ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мондагы ATTR-SUBST ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мондый CASES ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:мондые%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME CHECK мондый%{I%}%{n%} instead?
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мондыйлар CASES ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мондыйлары%{n%} CASES ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:болай CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:бу% кадәр COMMON-CLITICS ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:монча COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:монысы%{n%} CASES ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:бусы%{n%} CASES ; ! Dir/LR

бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:болар CASES-ETC ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:болары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ŠUL

шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:шул CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:шуның COMMON-CLITICS ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:шуңа COMMON-CLITICS ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:шуны COMMON-CLITICS ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:шуннан CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:шунда CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:шуныкы%{n%} CASES ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:шундагы ATTR-SUBST ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:шундый CASES ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:шулай CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:шулкадәр COMMON-CLITICS ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:шулкчаклы COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:шунча COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:шунысы%{n%} CASES ;

шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:шулар CASES-ETC ;
шул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:шулары%{n%} CASES ;

 LEXICON Verbs
айны:айны V-IV-IR ; ! "отрезвляться"
алтынла:алтынла V-TV-IR ; ! "gild,cover with gold"
аралаш:аралаш V-IV-IR ; ! ""
арттыр:арттыр V-TV-IR ; ! "to enlarge" (kaz tat) caus
ачын:ачын V-IV-IR ; ! "возмущаться,испытывать душевную боль"
ачыт:ачыт V-TV-IR ; ! "itch,gawn,acidify"
аш:аш V-IV-AR ; ! "перевалить"
багыш:багыш V-TV-NOPASS-IR ; ! "educate,look after" (kaz tat) coop
бас:бас V-IV-AR ; ! "вставать"
бас:бас V-TV-AR ; ! "давить;печатать"
башла:башла V-TV-IR ; ! "start,begin"
бәхәсләш:бәхәсләш V-IV-IR ; ! "argue,bet"
биз:биз V-IV-AR ; ! "renounce,disavow"
бир:бир V-TV-IR ; ! "давать,отдавать,сдавать"
боз:боз V-TV-AR ; ! "портить,нарушать,разрешить"
бугазла:бугазла V-TV-IR ; ! "seize by the throat"
булыш:булыш V-IV-IR ; ! "помогать"
бүл:бүл V-TV-AR ; ! "делить"
ваз% кич:ваз% кич V-IV-AR ; ! "deny"
гаҗәплән:гаҗәплән V-IV-IR ; ! "to be surprised"
дегетлә:дегетлә V-TV-IR ; ! "to tar"
дәвам% ит:дәвам% ит V-TV-AR ; ! ""
ерагай:ерагай V-IV-IR ; ! "remove oneself"
әрәм%-шәрәм% ит:әрәм%-шәрәм% ит V-TV-AR ; ! "to expend for nothing"
җәйлә:җәйлә V-IV-IR ; ! "to set up a summer camp"
җәрәхәтлә:җәрәхәтлә V-TV-IR ; ! "to damage"
җит:җит V-IV-AR ; ! "reach"
җый:җый V-TV-AR ; ! "to gather"
зәһәрәй:зәһәрәй V-IV-IR ; ! "to rage (of a hard frost)"
и:и V-TV-AR ; ! "bend,curve"
иш:иш V-TV-AR ; ! "to felt (wool)"
ияр:ияр V-IV-IR ; ! "follow"
иярлә:иярлә V-TV-IR ; ! "седлать"
йөз:йөз V-IV-AR ; ! "swim"
кабул% ит:кабул% ит V-TV-AR ; ! ""
кайт:кайт V-IV-IR ; ! "return"
каплат:каплат V-TV-IR ; ! "to force to lie (down)"
каркылда:каркылда V-IV-IR ; ! "to guffaw"
кил:кил V-IV-AR ; ! "come"
котла:котла V-TV-IR ; ! "to congratulate"
көл:көл V-IV-AR ; ! "laugh"
көт:көт V-TV-AR ; ! "wait"
кунак% бул:кунак% бул V-IV-IR ; ! "to stay with" Use/MT
күз% бу:күз% бу V-IV-AR ; ! "завораживать,гипнотизировать,заколдовывать" Use/MT
күр:күр V-TV-NOPASS-IR ; ! ""
күр:күрен V-TV-PASS-IR ; ! ""
кыркы:кыркы V-TV-IR ; ! "shear"
кырын% ят:кырын% ят V-IV-AR ; ! "to lie on one's side"
кыс:кыс V-TV-AR ; ! "press,squeeze"
мәлҗерә:мәлҗерә V-IV-IR ; ! "to become languid"
очкылык% тот:очкылык% тот V-IV-AR ; ! "hiccough" Use/MT
өз:өз V-TV-AR ; ! "cut,pluck" pluck
өлгерт:өлгерт V-TV-IR ; ! ""
пычра:пычра V-IV-IR ; ! "пачкать,марать"
рәттән% чык:рәттән% чык V-IV-AR ; ! "to spoil" Use/MT
сау:сау V-TV-AR ; ! "to milk"
симерт:симерт V-TV-IR ; ! "to fatten cattle" (tat) caus
си:си V-IV-AR ; ! "pee"
сөй:сөй V-TV-AR ; ! ""
сыеш:сыеш V-IV-IR ; ! "to get on (with someone)" coop?
сый:сый V-IV-AR ; ! "to go in"
таләп% ит:таләп% ит V-TV-AR ; ! ""
тамгала:тамгала V-TV-IR ; ! "to brand"
тап:тап V-TV-AR ; ! ""
тәмлелән:тәмлелән V-IV-IR ; ! "to become tasty"
тәрбиялә:тәрбиялә V-TV-IR ; ! "to cultivate" FIXME check
ти:ти V-IV-AR ; ! ""
төгәл% ит:төгәл% ит V-TV-AR ; ! "to elucidate" Use/MT
тукы:тукы V-TV-IR ; ! "weave"
туры% кил:туры% кил V-IV-AR ; ! "" Use/MT
түзеп% утыра% алма:түзеп% утыра% алма V-IV-IR ; ! "to be restless" Use/MT
үл:үл V-IV-AR ; ! ""
үлчә:үлчә V-TV-IR ; ! "measure,weigh"
үр:үр V-TV-AR ; ! "plait,weave"
фараз% кыл:фараз% кыл V-IV-IR ; ! "" Use/MT
хуш% кил:хуш% кил V-IV-AR ; ! "нравиться" Use/MT
чәнчеп% тиш:чәнчеп% тиш V-TV-AR ; ! "to puncture" Use/MT
чәнче:чәнче V-TV-IR ; ! "stab"
чөй% как:чөй% как V-IV-AR ; ! "to wedge in" Use/MT
чынла:чынла V-IV-IR ; ! "put up with"
шеш:шеш V-IV-AR ; ! "swell"
эреләндер:эреләндер V-TV-IR ; ! "to enlarge" (kaz tat) caus
ю:ю V-TV-AR ; ! "wash"
ябык:ябык V-IV-IR ; ! "lose weight"
ян:ян V-IV-AR ; ! ""
яңарт:яңарт V-TV-IR ; ! ""
яу:яу V-IV-AR ; ! "percipitate"
терәл:терәл V-IV-IR ; ! "" refl?
так:так V-TV-AR ; ! ""
якынайт:якынайт V-TV-IR ; ! "" caus
ал:ал VAUX-IR ; ! ""
башла:башла VAUX-IR ; ! ""
бет:бет VAUX-AR ; ! ""
бетер:бетер VAUX-IR ; ! "" ! FIXME causative
бир:бир VAUX-IR ; ! ""
бул:бул VAUX-IR ; ! ""
ит:ит VAUX-AR ; ! ""
йөр:йөр VAUX-IR ; ! ""
кал:кал VAUX-IR ; ! ""
кил:кил VAUX-IR ; ! ""
кит:кит VAUX-AR ; ! ""
сал:сал VAUX-IR ; ! ""
тор:тор VAUX-IR ; ! ""
утыр:утыр VAUX-IR ; ! ""
чык:чык VAUX-AR ; ! ""
яз:яз VAUX-AR ; ! ""
ят:ят VAUX-AR ; ! ""
